New Jersey, session 221, A5713.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.2001, c.88 (C.26:2S-7.2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    [Within 180 days of the adoption of the forms by regulation pursuant to this act, a] A carrier which offers a managed care plan shall accept the universal physician application for participation form and renewal form adopted pursuant to [this act] P.L.2001, c.88 (C.26:2S-7.1 et seq.) for the purpose of credentialing physicians who seek to participate in the carrier's provider network and for the purpose of credentialing physicians who are employed by hospitals or other health care facilities which seek to participate in the carrier's provider network.  An application received for the purposes of credentialing a physician pursuant to this section, or to renew a credential, shall be deemed approved if the information included as part of the application demonstrates the license of the physician as issued by the State Board of Medical Examiners is in good standing. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a carrier from requesting additional information from an applicant that is not provided for in the universal application or renewal form, as applicable, if the requested information does not duplicate any information included in the applicable form. (cf: P.L.2001, c.88, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall be applicable to applications for credentialing received on or after the effective date.